Idaho, session 2026, H0733.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3026B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3026B. AFFECTED BUSINESS ENTITIES -- STATE AND LOCAL TAXATION
TREATMENT. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Affected business entity" means any partnership or S corporation
that elects to be subject to tax pursuant to this section.
(b) "Affected business entity income" means, in the case of an electing
affected business entity, all items of income, gain, loss, or deduction
derived from or connected with Idaho sources, except for that portion of
such income, gain, loss, or deduction apportioned to an exempt entity
that is a member of the affected business entity.
(c) "Exempt entity" means an entity that is exempt from taxation under
this chapter.
(d) "Individual" means an individual, a trust, or an estate.
(e) "Member" means:
(i) A shareholder of an S corporation, except for exempt enti-
ties;
(ii) A partner in a general partnership, a limited partnership, or
a limited liability partnership, except for exempt entities; or
(iii) A member of a limited liability company that is treated as a
partnership or an S corporation for federal income tax purposes,
except for exempt entities.
(f) "Partnership" has the meaning provided in section 63-3006B, Idaho
Code. "Partnership" includes a limited liability company that is
treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes as described in
section 63-3006A, Idaho Code.


(g) "S corporation" means a corporation or limited liability company
that is treated as an S corporation for federal income tax purposes.
(h) "Taxable year" means the taxable year of a partnership or an S cor-
poration for federal income tax purposes.
(2)(a) A partnership or an S corporation may elect in the manner set
forth in this section to become an affected business entity required to
pay the tax under this section in any taxable year. A separate election
must be made for each taxable year.
(b) An election under this section must be made on a form and in the man-
ner as the state tax commission prescribes by rule or instruction.
(c) An election under this section may be made for any taxable year by
filing the election with a timely filed original return for such taxable
year. An election will also be valid if made by an amended return for the
taxable year filed before the original due date of the fifteenth day of
the fourth month following the taxable year.
(d) An election made under this section must be signed by:
(i) Each member of the electing entity who is a member at the time
the election is filed; or
(ii) Any officer, manager, or member of the electing entity who is
authorized under local law or by the entity's organizational docu-
ments to make the election and who represents under penalty of per-
jury that he has such authorization.
(e) An affected business entity is required to pay the tax imposed by
section 63-3082, Idaho Code, for each member that is not an Idaho resi-
dent.
(3) Each affected business entity that is a partnership or an S corpora-
tion transacting business in this state shall, on or before the fifteenth day
of the fourth month following the close of each taxable year, pay a tax in an
amount determined as follows:
(a) Add all of the affected business entity income derived from or con-
nected with sources within this state, as determined under the provi-
sions of this chapter;
(b) Increase or decrease the sum from paragraph (a) of this subsection
according to the modifications permitted or required under this chapter
for computing Idaho taxable income, to the extent they are attributable
to members subject to tax under this chapter;
(c) Multiply the result from paragraph (b) of this subsection by the
tax rate applicable to corporations provided in section 63-3025, Idaho
Code; and
(d) Apply any allowable credits earned by the affected business entity,
adjusted by the recapture provisions of section 63-3029B, Idaho Code.
All credits, including the allowable credits under this section from
another affected business entity as adjusted for the recapture provi-
sions of section 63-3029B, Idaho Code, shall flow through to the members
as otherwise permitted under this chapter. Any unused credits that are
allowed by law to be carried forward to succeeding taxable years may be
claimed in succeeding taxable years for which the affected business en-
tity elects to be subject to tax pursuant to this section. If the af-
fected business entity does not make the election under this section in


any succeeding taxable year, the unused credits will flow through to the
members as otherwise permitted under this chapter.
(4) If the amount calculated under subsection (3)(b) of this section
results in a net operating loss, such net operating loss may not be passed
through to the members of the affected business entity that makes the elec-
tion under this section but may be carried forward to succeeding taxable
years for which the affected business entity elects to be subject to tax
pursuant to this section until fully used. If the affected business entity
does not make the election under this section in any succeeding taxable year,
the unused net operating loss will flow through to the members as otherwise
permitted under this chapter.
(5) A nonresident individual who is a member is not required to file an
income tax return under section 63-3030, Idaho Code, for any taxable year in
which the only source of income derived from or connected with sources within
this state for such member, or the member and the member's spouse if a joint
federal income tax return is or shall be filed, is from one (1) or more af-
fected business entities and such affected business entity or entities file
and pay the tax due under this section.
(6) Each partnership and S corporation shall report to each of its mem-
bers, for each taxable year, such member's pro rata share of the tax imposed
under this section on such partnership or S corporation if it is an affected
business entity. Such pro rata share of the tax shall be calculated by ex-
cluding the share of any member that is an exempt entity.
(7)(a) Each individual who is a member and is not an exempt entity is
entitled to a credit against such tax. The credit will be in an amount
equal to the individual's pro rata share of the tax paid under this
section by any affected business entity of which the individual is a
member. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this paragraph
exceeds the individual's tax liability for the tax imposed under this
chapter, the individual will be paid a refund equal to the balance of the
unused credit. Such pro rata share of the tax credit shall be calculated
by excluding the share of any member that is an exempt entity.
(b) Each individual who is a member and is not an exempt entity, as a
resident or a part-year resident of this state, is entitled to a credit
against such tax for the individual's pro rata share of taxes paid to an-
other state of the United States or the District of Columbia on income
of any partnership or S corporation of which the individual is a mem-
ber that is derived therefrom. Any such credit will be calculated in the
manner prescribed by the state tax commission and shall be consistent
with the provisions of section 63-3029, Idaho Code. Such pro rata share
of the tax credit shall be calculated by excluding the share of any mem-
ber that is an exempt entity.
(8) Each corporation that is a member and is subject to the tax im-
posed under section 63-3025 or 63-3025A, Idaho Code, is entitled to a credit
against such tax. The credit will be in an amount equal to the corporation's
pro rata share of the tax paid under this section by any affected business
entity of which the corporation is a member. Such credit will be applied
after all other applicable credits have been applied. Any balance of the
credit not used in the taxable year during which the corporation reports the
net income from such affected business entities will be paid as a refund to


the corporation. Such pro rata share of the tax credit shall be calculated by
excluding the share of any member that is an exempt entity.
(9) Each affected business entity that is a member of another affected
business entity and elects to be subject to the tax imposed under this sec-
tion is entitled to a credit against such tax. The credit will be in an amount
equal to the affected business entity's pro rata share of the tax paid under
this section by any affected business entity of which the affected business
entity is a member. Such credit will be applied after all other applicable
credits have been applied. Any balance of the credit not used in the tax-
able year during which the affected business entity reports net income will
be paid as a refund to the affected business entity. Such pro rata share of
the tax credit shall be calculated by excluding the share of any member that
is an exempt entity.
(10) Each pass-through entity, as defined in section 63-3006C, Idaho
Code, that is a member of an affected business entity and does not elect to
be subject to the tax imposed under this section is entitled to a credit.
The credit will be in an amount equal to the pass-through entity's pro rata
share of the tax paid under this section by any affected business entity of
which the pass-through entity is a member. Such credit will be applied af-
ter all other applicable taxes and credits have been applied. Any balance
of the credit not used in the taxable year will be paid as a refund to the
pass-through entity.
(11) For trusts and estates that distribute their income to their bene-
ficiaries to be reported by and taxed to said beneficiaries, the credit pro-
vided in subsection (7)(a) of this section shall be apportioned between the
trust or estate and the beneficiaries in the same proportion as the income is
allocated to and reported by the trust or estate and the beneficiaries.
(12) The penalty and interest and penalty provisions and the collection
and enforcement procedures provided by sections 63-3038 through 63-3040,
63-3042 through 63-3065A, 63-3071, 63-3075, and 63-3078, Idaho Code, shall
apply and be available to the state tax commission for enforcement of the
provisions of this section and collection of any amounts due under this
section. Said sections shall, for this purpose, be considered part of this
section, and wherever liens or any other proceedings are defined as income
tax liens or proceedings, they shall, when applied in enforcement or collec-
tion under this section, be described as affected business entity tax liens
and proceedings.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-3068, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3068. PERIOD OF LIMITATIONS FOR ISSUING A NOTICE OF DEFICIENCY AND
COLLECTION OF TAX. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a notice
of deficiency, as provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, for the tax im-
posed in this chapter shall be issued within three (3) years from either the
due date of the return, without regard to extensions, or from the date the re-
turn was filed, whichever is later.
(b) If an assessment has been made as provided in this chapter, then
such tax shall be collected either by levy, or by a proceeding brought in
court, within a period of twelve (12) years from the date of entry of the
record of assessment required by section 63-3045A, Idaho Code, of the tax and


provided, further, that this shall not be in derogation of any of the reme-
dies elsewhere provided in this chapter.
(c) In the case of a fraudulent return or a false return with the intent
to evade the tax imposed in this chapter, or a willful attempt in any manner
to defeat or evade the tax imposed in this chapter, a notice of deficiency may
be issued, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for collection of
such tax may be begun without assessment, at any time.
(d) In the case of a failure to file a return, for any reason, a notice
of deficiency may be issued, the tax imposed in this chapter may be assessed,
or a proceeding in court for collection of such tax may be begun without as-
sessment, at any time, unless the taxpayer had a reasonable belief that no
return was required to be filed under this chapter, in which case any defi-
ciency, assessment, or proceeding for collection of such tax shall be com-
menced within three (3) years of the time the return was due.
(e) In the case of income received during the lifetime of a decedent,
or by his estate during the period of administration, a notice of deficiency
shall be issued, a claim shall be made, the tax shall be assessed or any pro-
ceeding in court without assessment for the collection of such tax shall be
begun, within twelve (12) months after written request for prompt action is
filed with the state tax commission by the executor, administrator, or other
fiduciary representing the estate of such decedent. This subsection shall
not apply if the return for which the request for prompt action relates has
not been filed with the state tax commission.
(f) When Idaho taxable income or tax credits for any taxable year have
been adjusted as a result of a final federal determination adjustment, the
period of limitation for issuing a notice of deficiency shall be reopened and
shall not expire until the later of one (1) year from the date of delivery
of the final federal determination to the state tax commission by the tax-
payer, date, three (3) years from the due date of the return, without regard
to extensions, or three (3) years from the date the return was filed. For
purposes of this subsection section the term "final federal determination
adjustment" shall mean the final resolution of all issues which were ad-
justed by the internal revenue service shall have the same meaning as that
term is defined in section 63-3070(2)(i), Idaho Code, and "final determi-
nation date" shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in section
63-3070(2)(h), Idaho Code. When the final federal determination adjustment
is submitted, the taxpayer shall also submit copies of all schedules and
written explanations provided by the internal revenue service. Upon the
expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (a) and
(m) of this section, only those specific items of income, deductions, gains,
losses, or credits which were adjusted in the final federal determination
adjustment shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of recomputing Idaho
income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the effect of such adjust-
ments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.
(g) If an adjustment, which was made within the period of limitations
as provided in this section, affects the amount of tax credit, net operating
loss, or capital loss, claimed in a taxable year other than the tax year in
which the adjustment is made, then adjustments to the credit, net operating
loss, or capital loss claimed in such other tax year may be made and a result-


ing notice of deficiency may be issued even though such notice of deficiency
would otherwise be barred under the provisions of this section.
(h) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, when an
amended Idaho return is filed within the period of limitations as provided in
subsections (a) and (m) of this section, the period of limitations for issu-
ing a notice of deficiency shall be three (3) years from the date the amended
return was filed. However, upon the expiration of the period of limitations
as provided in subsections (a) and (m) of this section, only those specific
items of income, deductions, gains, losses, or credits, which were adjusted
in the amended Idaho return shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of
recomputing Idaho income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the ef-
fect of such adjustments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.
(i) If a taxpayer has filed an amended federal return, and no corre-
sponding Idaho amended return has been filed with the state tax commission,
then the period of limitations for issuing a notice of deficiency shall be
reopened and shall not expire until three (3) years from the date of deliv-
ery to the tax commission by the taxpayer of the amended federal return. How-
ever, upon the expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsec-
tions (a) and (m) of this section, then only those specific items of income,
deductions, gains, losses, or credits, which were adjusted in the amended
federal return shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of recomputing
Idaho income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the effect of such ad-
justments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.
(j) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a notice of
deficiency, related to items on the return of any pass-through entity, as de-
fined in this section, which other taxpayers are required by law to report,
shall be issued to such other taxpayers within the later of three (3) years
from the due date of the other taxpayers' return, without regard to exten-
sions, three (3) years from the date the other taxpayers' returns were filed,
or three (3) years from the date of filing of the pass-through entity's re-
turn. If the pass-through entity files an amended return, notices of defi-
ciency may be issued to the other taxpayers within three (3) years from the
date the amended return for the pass-through entity was filed with the state
tax commission. If the pass-through entity files an amended return with the
internal revenue service, or the internal revenue service issues a final de-
termination to the pass-through entity, then the period of limitations for
issuing a notice of deficiency to the other taxpayers shall be reopened and
shall not expire until three (3) years from the date of delivery to the tax
commission by the pass-through entity of the amended federal return or the
later of one (1) year from the date of delivery to the state tax commission
by the pass-through entity of the final federal determination adjustment,
three (3) years from the due date of the pass-through entity's return, with-
out regard to extensions, or three (3) years from the date the pass-through
entity's return was filed.
(k) For purposes of this section, "pass-through entity" means a part-
nership, S corporation, trust, limited liability company or any other en-
tity whose items of income, deductions, gains, losses and credits must be re-
ported by other taxpayer(s). For further purposes of this section, the term
"other taxpayer" shall include, by way of unlimiting example, such taxpayers
as partners, shareholders, beneficiaries, joint venturers or investors.


(l) In the case of a duplicate return filed under section 63-217(1)(b),
Idaho Code, the limitation under this section shall be the later of one (1)
year from the filing of the duplicate return or the date otherwise applicable
under this section.
(m) Prior to the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for
the issuance of a notice of deficiency for the tax imposed in this chapter,
both the state tax commission, its delegate or deputy, and the taxpayer may
consent in writing to extend the period of time within which a notice of defi-
ciency may be issued. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent
agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously
agreed upon. When a pass-through entity extends the period of limitations
in accordance with this subsection, the period of limitations for the other
taxpayers is automatically extended for the same period for the purpose of
issuing a notice of deficiency to the other taxpayers reflecting the adjust-
ments to the pass-through entity's return.
(n) The expiration of the period of limitations as provided in this sec-
tion shall be suspended for the time period during which the state tax com-
mission is prohibited from issuing a notice of deficiency, making the as-
sessment, or from collecting by levy or a proceeding in court, and for thirty
(30) days thereafter.
(o) For the purposes of this section, "return" includes a notice of de-
ficiency determination issued by the state tax commission when no return was
filed by the taxpayer. Such a return is deemed filed on the date the taxes de-
termined by the state tax commission are assessed.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-3069, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3069. NOTICE OF ADJUSTMENT OF FEDERAL OR STATE TAX LIABILITY. (1)
Upon final determination of any deficiency or refund of federal taxes, the
taxpayer is required to send written notice to the state tax commission
within one hundred twenty (120) one hundred eighty (180) days of the final
determination date.
(2) Upon final determination of any deficiency or refund of income tax
due to another state or territory to which the credit for taxes paid another
state or territory applies, as provided in section 63-3029, Idaho Code,
the taxpayer is required to send written notice to the state tax commission
within one hundred twenty (120) one hundred eighty (180) days of the final
determination date.
(3) If the notice required by this section is not sent by the taxpayer to
the state tax commission within one hundred twenty (120) one hundred eighty
(180) days of the final determination date, the taxpayer will be subject to
the negligence penalty provided by section 63-3046, Idaho Code.
(4) As used in this section, "final determination date" has the same
meaning as that term is defined in section 63-3070(2)(h), Idaho Code.
(5) A taxpayer subject to a federal audit is eligible to make estimated
payments to the state tax commission in the same manner as provided in sec-
tion 63-3070(6), Idaho Code.


SECTION 4. That Chapter 30, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-3070, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-3070. PARTNERSHIP INCOME -- FEDERAL ADJUSTMENTS. (1) The defini-
tions set forth in this chapter shall apply to this section unless modified
in this section or unless the context clearly requires another definition.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative adjustment request" means a request for an admin-
istrative adjustment filed by a partnership under section 6227 of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(b) "Audited partnership" means a partnership subject to a partner-
ship-level audit resulting in a federal adjustment.
(c) "Corporate partner" means a partner subject to tax under section
63-3025 or 63-3025A, Idaho Code.
(d) "Direct partner" means a partner that holds an interest directly in
a partnership or pass-through entity.
(e) "Exempt partner" means a partner that is exempt from taxation under
this chapter except on unrelated business taxable income.
(f) "Federal adjustment" means a change to an item or amount determined
by the Internal Revenue Code that is used by a taxpayer to compute Idaho
state income tax owed, whether that change results from action by the
internal revenue service, including a partnership-level audit, or from
the filing of an amended federal return, a federal refund claim, or an
administrative adjustment request by the taxpayer.
(g) "Federal partnership representative" means the person the partner-
ship designates for the taxable year as the partnership's representa-
tive or the person the internal revenue service has appointed to act as
the federal partnership representative pursuant to section 6223(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(h) "Final determination date" means the following:
(i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, if the federal adjustment arises from an internal rev-
enue service audit or other action by the internal revenue ser-
vice, the final determination date is the first day on which no
federal adjustments arising from that audit or other action remain
to be finally determined, whether by internal revenue service de-
cision with respect to which all rights of appeal have been waived
or exhausted, by agreement, or, if appealed or contested, by a fi-
nal decision with respect to which all rights of appeal have been
waived or exhausted. For agreements required to be signed by a
representative of the internal revenue service and the taxpayer,
the final determination date is the date on which the last party
signed the agreement.
(ii) For federal adjustments arising from an internal revenue
service audit or other action by the internal revenue service, if
the taxpayer filed as a member of a combined report or consolidated
return under Idaho law, the final determination date is the first
day on which no related federal adjustments arising from such au-


dit remain to be finally determined, as described in subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph for the entire group.
(iii) If the federal adjustment results from filing an amended
federal return, a federal refund claim, or an administrative ad-
justment request, or if it is a federal adjustment reported on an
amended federal return or other similar report filed pursuant to
section 6225 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the final determi-
nation date is the day on which the amended return, refund claim,
administrative adjustment request, or other similar report was
filed.
(i) "Final federal adjustment" means a federal adjustment that can no
longer be modified because the final determination date for that fed-
eral adjustment has passed.
(j) "Indirect partner" means a partner in a partnership or pass-through
entity that itself holds an interest directly or through another indi-
rect partner in a partnership or pass-through entity.
(k) "Nonresident partner" means an individual, trust, or estate part-
ner that is not a resident partner.
(l) "Partner" means a person that holds an interest directly or indi-
rectly in a partnership or other pass-through entity.
(m) "Partnership-level audit" means an examination by the internal
revenue service at the partnership level pursuant to sections 6221
through 6241 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by P.L. 114-74 and
as in effect on November 2, 2015, that results in federal adjustments.
(n) "Reallocation adjustment" means a federal adjustment resulting
from a partnership-level audit or an administrative adjustment request
that changes the share of one (1) or more items of partnership income,
gain, loss, expense, or credit allocated to direct partners.
(o) "Report of federal adjustments" means the taxpayer's report of fi-
nal federal adjustments to the Idaho state tax commission, including an
amended Idaho income tax return, information return, or a uniform mul-
tistate report.
(p) "Resident partner" means an individual, trust, or estate partner
that is a resident in Idaho under section 63-3013, Idaho Code, for the
relevant tax period.
(q) "Reviewed year" means the taxable year of a partnership that is sub-
ject to a partnership-level audit from which federal adjustments arise.
(r) "Tiered partner" means any partner that is a partnership or pass-
through entity.
(s) "Unrelated business taxable income" has the same meaning as pro-
vided in section 512(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) Unless an election has been made pursuant to section 63-3026B,
Idaho Code, a taxpayer shall report and pay any Idaho tax due with respect
to final federal adjustments arising from an audit or other action by the
internal revenue service or reported by the taxpayer on a timely filed
amended federal income tax return, including a return or other similar re-
port filed pursuant to section 6225(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, or
a federal claim for refund, by filing a report of federal adjustments with
the state tax commission for the reviewed year and, if applicable, paying the
additional Idaho tax owed by the taxpayer no later than one hundred eighty


(180) days after the final determination date. This requirement shall not
apply in the case of final federal adjustments required to be reported by a
partnership and its partners using the procedures set forth in subsection
(4) of this section and final federal adjustments required to be reported
for federal purposes pursuant to section 6225(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue
Code. If an election has been made pursuant to section 63-3026B, Idaho Code,
the procedures and time frames set forth in this section shall apply to the
electing partnership rather than the individual partners.
(4) Except for adjustments required to be reported for federal pur-
poses pursuant to section 6225(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and the
distributive share of adjustments that has been reported as required under
subsection (3) of this section, partnerships and partners shall report final
federal adjustments arising from a partnership-level audit or an adminis-
trative adjustment request and make payments as follows:
(a) A state partnership representative shall act on behalf of the part-
nership as follows:
(i) With respect to an action required or permitted to be taken by
a partnership under this subsection, and a proceeding under sec-
tion 63-3048, Idaho Code, with respect to that action, the state
partnership representative for the reviewed year shall have the
sole authority to act on behalf of the partnership. The partner-
ship's direct partners and indirect partners shall be bound by
those actions.
(ii) The state partnership representative for the reviewed year
is the partnership's federal partnership representative unless
the partnership designates in writing another person as its state
partnership representative.
(iii) The state tax commission may establish reasonable quali-
fications and procedures for designating a person other than the
federal partnership representative to be the state partnership
representative.
(b) Final federal adjustments subject to the requirements of this sub-
section, except for those subject to a properly made election pursuant
to paragraph (c) of this subsection, shall be reported as follows:
(i) No later than ninety (90) days after the final determination
date, the partnership shall:
1. File a completed report of federal adjustments, includ-
ing information required by Idaho law, with the state tax
commission;
2. Notify each of its direct partners of their distributive
share of the final federal adjustments, including informa-
tion required by the state tax commission; and
3. File an amended composite return for direct partners as
required pursuant to section 63-3022L, Idaho Code, or an
amended withholding return for direct partners as required
pursuant to section 63-3035, Idaho Code, and pay the ad-
ditional amount pursuant to sections 63-3024 and 63-3025,
Idaho Code, that would have been due had the final federal
adjustments been reported properly as required.


(ii) Except as provided under section 63-3025, Idaho Code, no
later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the final deter-
mination date, each direct partner taxed pursuant to section
63-3025, Idaho Code, shall:
1. File a report of federal adjustments reporting its dis-
tributive share of the adjustments reported under subpara-
graph (i)2. of this paragraph, as required under section
63-3069, Idaho Code; and
2. Pay any additional amount of tax due as if the report of
federal adjustments had been properly reported, plus any in-
terest and penalty due under sections 63-3045, 63-3046, and
63-3075, Idaho Code, and less any credit for related amounts
paid or withheld and remitted on behalf of the direct partner
under subparagraph (i)3. of this paragraph.
(c)(i) Subject to the limitations provided in subparagraph (iii)
of this paragraph, an audited partnership making an election un-
der this paragraph shall, no later than ninety (90) days after the
final determination date, file a completed report of federal ad-
justments, including the information required by section 63-3069,
Idaho Code, and notify the state tax commission that it is making
the election under this subsection.
(ii) Subject to the limitations provided in subparagraph (iii) of
this paragraph, an audited partnership making an election under
this paragraph shall, no later than one hundred eighty (180) days
after the final determination date, pay, in lieu of taxes owed by
its direct and indirect partners, an amount determined according
to this subparagraph as follows:
1. Exclude from final federal adjustments the distributive
share of these adjustments reported to a direct exempt part-
ner not subject to tax under section 63-3025, Idaho Code;
2. For the total distributive shares of the remaining final
federal adjustments reported to direct corporate partners
subject to tax under section 63-3025, Idaho Code, and to di-
rect exempt partners subject to tax under section 63-3025,
Idaho Code, apportion and allocate such adjustments as
provided in section 63-3027, Idaho Code, and multiply the
resulting amount by the highest tax rate under section
63-3024, Idaho Code;
3. For the total distributive shares of the remaining final
federal adjustments reported to nonresident direct partners
subject to tax under section 63-3024, Idaho Code, determine
the amount of the adjustments that is Idaho source income un-
der section 63-3026A, Idaho Code, and multiply the resulting
amount by the highest tax rate under section 63-3024, Idaho
Code;
4. For the total distributive shares of the remaining final
federal adjustments reported to tiered partners:
(A) Determine the amount of the adjustments of a type
subject to sourcing to Idaho under section 63-3026A,
Idaho Code, then determine the portion of this amount


that would be sourced to Idaho by applying rules pro-
mulgated by the state tax commission;
(B) Determine the amount of the adjustments of a type
not subject to sourcing to Idaho by a nonresident part-
ner under section 63-3026A, Idaho Code;
(C) Of the amount determined in subparagraph (ii)4.(A)
and (B) of this paragraph, determine the portion that,
pursuant to rules promulgated by the state tax commis-
sion, is properly allocable to nonresident indirect
partners or other partners not subject to tax on the
adjustments or the portion that can be excluded un-
der procedures for alternative reporting and payment
method allowed under paragraph (e) of this subsection;
5. Multiply the total of the amounts determined in subpara-
graph (ii)4.(A) and (B) of this paragraph reduced by the
amount determined in subparagraph (ii)4.(C) of this para-
graph by the highest tax rate under section 63-3024, Idaho
Code;
6. For the total distributive shares of the remaining final
federal adjustments reported to resident direct partners
subject to tax under section 63-3024, Idaho Code, multiply
that amount by the highest tax rate under section 63-3024,
Idaho Code; and
7. Add the amounts determined in subparagraph (ii)2.,
3., 5., and 6. of this paragraph, along with interest
and penalty as provided in sections 63-3045, 63-3046, and
63-3075, Idaho Code.
(iii) Final federal adjustments subject to this election ex-
clude:
1. The distributive share of final audit adjustments that
under section 63-3027, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated by
the state tax commission, must be included in the unitary
business income of any direct or indirect corporate part-
ner, provided it can be reasonably determined by the audited
partnership; and
2. Any final federal adjustments resulting from an adminis-
trative adjustment request.
(iv) An audited partnership not otherwise subject to any report-
ing or payment obligation to the state of Idaho that makes an elec-
tion under this subsection consents to be subject to Idaho laws re-
lating to reporting, assessment, payment, and collection of Idaho
tax calculated under the election.
(d) The direct and indirect partners of an audited partnership that are
tiered partners, and all of the partners of those tiered partners that
are subject to tax under sections 63-3024 and 63-3025, Idaho Code, are
subject to the reporting and payment requirements of paragraph (b) of
this subsection, and the tiered partners are entitled to make the elec-
tions provided in paragraphs (c) and (e) of this subsection. The tiered
partners or their partners shall make the required reports and payments
no later than ninety (90) days after the time for filing and furnishing


statements to tiered partners and their partners as established under
section 6226 of the Internal Revenue Code and the federal regulations
thereunder. The state tax commission may promulgate rules to estab-
lish procedures and interim time periods for the reports and payments
required by tiered partners and their partners and for making the elec-
tions under this subsection.
(e) Under procedures adopted by the state tax commission, an audited
partnership or tiered partner may enter into an agreement with the state
tax commission to use an alternative reporting and payment method, in-
cluding applicable time requirements or any other provision of this
subsection, if the audited partnership or tiered partner demonstrates
that the requested method will reasonably provide for the reporting and
payment of taxes, penalties, and interest due under the provisions of
this subsection. Application for approval of an alternative reporting
and payment method must be made by the audited partnership or tiered
partner within the time for election as provided in this paragraph or
paragraph (c) of this subsection, as appropriate.
(f)(i) The election made pursuant to paragraph (c) or (e) of this
subsection is irrevocable unless the state tax commission, in its
discretion, determines otherwise.
(ii) If properly reported and paid by the audited partnership or
tiered partner, or by a partnership that has filed an election un-
der section 63-3026B, Idaho Code, the amount determined in para-
graph (c)(ii) of this subsection, or similarly under an optional
election under paragraph (e) of this subsection, will be treated
as paid in lieu of taxes owed by its direct and indirect partners,
to the extent applicable, on the same final federal adjustments.
The direct partners or indirect partners may not take any deduc-
tion or credit for this amount or claim a refund of the amount in
this state. Nothing in this paragraph precludes a direct resident
partner from claiming a credit against taxes paid to this state
pursuant to section 63-3029, Idaho Code, for any amounts paid by
the audited partnership or tiered partner on the resident part-
ner's behalf to another state or local tax jurisdiction in accor-
dance with the provisions of section 63-3029, Idaho Code.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the state
tax commission from assessing direct partners or indirect partners for
taxes they owe, using the best information available, in the event that
a partnership or tiered partner fails for any reason to timely make any
report or payment required by this section or by section 63-3026B, Idaho
Code.
(5) The state tax commission shall make adjustments as needed for any
additional tax, interest, and penalties arising from final federal adjust-
ments arising from an audit by the internal revenue service, including a
partnership-level audit, or reported by the taxpayer on an amended federal
income tax return or as part of an administrative adjustment request by the
dates provided in this subsection.
(a) If a taxpayer files with the state tax commission a report of fed-
eral adjustments or an amended Idaho tax return as required within the
period specified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the state


tax commission may adjust any amounts, including in-lieu-of amounts,
taxes, interest, and penalties arising from those federal adjustments
if the state tax commission issues a notice of deficiency determination
to the taxpayer no later than:
(i) The expiration of the limitations period specified in section
63-3068 or 63-3072, Idaho Code; or
(ii) The expiration of the one (1) year period following the date
of the filing with the state tax commission of the report of fed-
eral adjustments.
(b) If the taxpayer fails to file the report of federal adjustments
within the period specified in subsection (3) or (4) of this section,
as appropriate, or the report of federal adjustments filed by the tax-
payer omits final federal adjustments or understates the correct amount
of tax owed, the state tax commission may assess amounts or additional
amounts, taxes, interest, and penalties arising from the report of fed-
eral adjustments if it mails a notice of deficiency determination to the
taxpayer by a date that is the latest of the following:
(i) The expiration of the limitations period specified in section
63-3068, Idaho Code;
(ii) The expiration of the one (1) year period following the date
the report of federal adjustments was filed with the state tax com-
mission; or
(iii) Absent fraud, the expiration of the six (6) year period fol-
lowing the final federal determination date.
(6) A taxpayer may make estimated payments to the state tax commission,
following the process prescribed by the state tax commission, of Idaho tax
expected to result from a pending internal revenue service audit prior to
the due date of the report of federal adjustments without having to file the
report with the state tax commission. The estimated tax payments shall be
credited against any tax liability ultimately found to be due to Idaho and
shall limit the accrual of further statutory interest on that amount. If the
estimated tax payments exceed the final tax liability and statutory inter-
est ultimately determined to be due, the taxpayer is entitled to a refund or
credit for the excess, provided the taxpayer files a report of federal ad-
justments claiming a refund or credit of tax pursuant to section 63-3072,
Idaho Code, no later than one (1) year following the final federal determi-
nation.
(7)(a) Except for final federal adjustments required to be reported for
federal purposes under section 6225(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code,
a taxpayer may file a claim for refund or credit of tax arising from fed-
eral adjustments made by the internal revenue service on or before the
later of:
(i) The expiration of the last day for filing a claim for refund
or credit of Idaho tax pursuant to section 63-3072, Idaho Code, in-
cluding any extensions; or
(ii) One (1) year from the date a report of federal adjustments
prescribed in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, as applica-
ble, was due to the state tax commission, including any extensions
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section.


(b) The report of federal adjustments shall serve as the means for
the taxpayer to report additional tax due, report a claim for refund
or credit of tax, and make other adjustments, including to its net op-
erating losses, resulting from adjustments to the taxpayer's federal
taxable income.
(8)(a) Unless otherwise agreed in writing by the taxpayer and the state
tax commission, any adjustments by the state tax commission or by the
taxpayer made after the expiration of the time period set forth in sec-
tion 63-3068, Idaho Code, shall be limited to changes to the taxpayer's
tax liability arising from federal adjustments.
(b) The time periods provided for in section 63-3069, Idaho Code, may be
extended:
(i) Automatically, upon written notice to the state tax commis-
sion, by sixty (60) days for an audited partnership or tiered part-
ner that has ten thousand (10,000) or more direct partners; or
(ii) By written agreement between the taxpayer and the state tax
commission pursuant to section 63-3068(m), Idaho Code.
(c) Any extension granted under this subsection for filing the report
of federal adjustments extends the last day prescribed by law for as-
sessing any additional tax arising from the adjustments to federal tax-
able income and the period for filing a claim for refund or credit of
taxes pursuant to section 63-3068, Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 63-3072, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3072. CREDITS AND REFUNDS. (a) Subject to the provisions of subsec-
tions (b), (c) and (h) of this section, where there has been an overpayment
of the tax imposed by the provisions of this chapter, the amount of such over-
payment shall be credited against any tax administered by the state tax com-
mission which tax is then due from the taxpayer, and any balance of such ex-
cess shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
(b) Except in regard to amounts withheld as provided in section
63-3035, 63-3035A or 63-3036, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as estimated
payments under section 63-3036A, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as backup
withholding under section 63-3036B, Idaho Code, a claim for refund of tax,
penalties, or interest paid shall be made within the later of three (3)
years of the due date of the return, without regard to extensions, or three
(3) years from the date the return was filed, and a claim for credit of tax,
penalties, or interest paid shall be made within the later of ten (10) years
of the due date of the return, without regard to extensions, or ten (10) years
from the date the return was filed. However, with regard to remittances
received with an extension of time to file, or a tentative return, a claim
for credit or refund of such remittances shall be made within three (3) years
from the due date of the return without regard to extensions.
(c) With regard to amounts withheld as provided in section 63-3035,
63-3035A or 63-3036, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as estimated payments under
section 63-3036A, Idaho Code, or amounts paid as backup withholding under
section 63-3036B, Idaho Code, a claim for refund shall be made within three
(3) years from the due date of the return, without regard to extensions,
for the taxable year in respect to which the tax was withheld or paid, and a


claim for credit shall be made within ten (10) years from the due date of the
return, without regard to extensions, for the taxable year with respect to
which the tax was withheld or paid. However, with regard to an individual
who is entitled to an extension of time as provided in section 7508 of the
Internal Revenue Code, the three (3) year period provided in this subsection
for claiming a credit or refund shall be extended by the number of days disre-
garded under section 7508 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, when Idaho
taxable income and/or tax credits for any taxable year have been adjusted
as a result of a final federal determination adjustment, the period of lim-
itations for claiming a refund or credit of tax, penalties, or interest
shall be reopened and shall not expire until the later of one (1) year from
the date of delivery of the final federal determination to the taxpayer by
the internal revenue service date, three (3) years from the due date of the
return, without regard to extensions, or three (3) years from the date the
return was filed. For purposes of this subsection, the term "final federal
determination adjustment" shall mean the final resolution of all issues
which were adjusted by the internal revenue service have the same meaning as
that term is defined in section 63-3070(2)(i), Idaho Code, and "final deter-
mination rate" shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in section
63-3070(2)(h), Idaho Code. When the final federal determination adjustment
is submitted, the taxpayer shall also submit copies of all schedules and
written explanations provided by the internal revenue service. Upon the
expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (b) and
(h) of this section, only those specific items of income, deductions, gains,
losses or credits which were adjusted in the final federal determination
adjustment shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of recomputing Idaho
income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the effect of such adjust-
ments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.
(e) If a claim for credit or refund relates to an overpayment attribut-
able to a net operating loss carryback incurred in a taxable year commencing
in 2012 or earlier, or a capital loss carryback, in lieu of the period of lim-
itations prescribed in subsection (b) of this section, the period shall be
that period which ends with the expiration of the fifteenth day of the for-
tieth month following the end of the taxable year of the net operating loss
or capital loss which results in such carryback. Claims for net operating
losses carried back from taxable years commencing after 2012 shall be made
pursuant to section 63-3022, Idaho Code.
(f) If an adjustment, which was made within the period of limitations
as provided in this section, affects the amount of tax credit, net operating
loss, or capital loss, claimed in a taxable year other than the tax year in
which the adjustment is made, then adjustments to the credit, net operating
loss, or capital loss, claimed in such other tax year may be made and a claim
for credit or refund of tax, penalties or interest may be made even though
such claim would otherwise be barred under the provisions of this section.
(g) In the case of a duplicate return filed under section 63-217(1)(b),
Idaho Code, the limitations under this section shall be the later of one (1)
year from the filing of the duplicate return or the date otherwise applicable
under this section.


(h) Prior to the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for
credit or refund of any tax imposed by the provisions of this chapter, both
the state tax commission or its delegate or deputy and the taxpayer may con-
sent in writing to extend such period of time. The period so agreed upon may
be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration
of the period previously agreed upon. When a pass-through entity extends the
period of limitations in accordance with the provisions of this subsection
the period of limitations for the other taxpayers is automatically extended
for the same period for the purpose of claiming a credit or refund of tax,
penalties or interest by the other taxpayers reflecting the pass-through en-
tity adjustments.
(i) The expiration of the period of limitations as provided in this sec-
tion shall be suspended for the time period between the issuance by the state
tax commission of a notice under either section 63-3045 or 63-3065, Idaho
Code, and the final resolution of any proceeding resulting from the notice.
(j) Appeal of a state tax commission decision denying in whole or in
part a claim for credit or refund shall be made in accordance with and within
the time limits prescribed in section 63-3049, Idaho Code.
(k) For purposes of this section, "return" includes a notice of defi-
ciency determination issued by the state tax commission when no return was
filed by the taxpayer. Such a return is deemed filed on the date the taxes de-
termined by the state tax commission are assessed.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.